Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2502
Purpose of act.

It is the purpose of the Joint Public Agency Act to permit local governmental units to make the most efficient use of their taxing authority and other powers by enabling them to cooperate with other governmental units on a basis of mutual advantage and thereby to provide services and facilities in a manner and pursuant to forms of governmental organization that will accord best with geographic, economic, population, and other factors influencing the needs and development of local communities.

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 2.